Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 353.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Annuity starting date. new text end new text begin "Annuity starting date" means the first day of the first period for which an amount is payable as an annuity. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 353.37, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Retirement age. For purposes of this section, "retirement age" meansnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end retirement age as defined in United States Code, title 42, section 416(l)new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) 55 years of age for the public employees police and fire retirement plannew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 353.37, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Suspension of annuity. (a) The association shall suspend the annuity on the first of the month after the month in which the salary of the reemployed annuitant described in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), exceeds the maximums set in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), based only on those months in which the annuitant is actually employed in nonelective public service in a position covered under this chapter or employment with a labor organization that represents public employees who are members of a retirement plan under this chapter or chapter 353E. (b) An annuitant who is elected to public office after retirement may hold that office and receive an annuity otherwise payable from a retirement plan administered by the association. new text begin (c) The association must not suspend an annuity based on an annuitant's reemployment, regardless of the annuitant's income, if the annuitant has reached retirement age. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [353.6515] RETIREMENT ANNUITY WITHOUT SEPARATION FROM PUBLIC SERVICE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Retirement annuity while employed. new text end new text begin Any member of the public employees police and fire retirement plan who has not separated from public service, has attained at least 55 years of age, and is partially or 100 percent vested under section 353.01, subdivision 47, is entitled upon application to a normal retirement annuity under section 353.651. In the application, the member must designate an annuity starting date that must not be earlier than the date on which the member attains 55 years of age. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Effect on retirement annuity and contributions. new text end new text begin Continued employment by a member described in subdivision 1 must not increase or decrease the amount of the member's annuity. Neither the member nor the member's employer may make any further contributions to the public employees police and fire retirement plan by reason of the member's continued employment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 4 are effective January 1, 2026. new text end